New York, session 2025-2026, S2334.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subsection (i) of section 3216 of the insurance law is 2 amended by adding a new paragraph 40 to read as follows: 3 (40) Screening for the detection of elevated lead levels covered under 4 the policy shall not be subject to annual deductibles or coinsurance. 5 For the purposes of this paragraph, "elevated lead levels" shall have 6 the same meaning as set forth in subdivision six of section thirteen 7 hundred seventy of the public health law. 8 § 2. Subsection (k) of section 3221 of the insurance law is amended by 9 adding a new paragraph 24 to read as follows: 10 (24) Screening for the detection of elevated lead levels covered under 11 the policy shall not be subject to annual deductibles or coinsurance. 12 For the purposes of this paragraph, "elevated lead levels" shall have 13 the same meaning as set forth in subdivision six of section thirteen 14 hundred seventy of the public health law. 15 § 3. Section 4303 of the insurance law is amended by adding a new 16 subsection (ww) to read as follows: 17 (ww) Screening for the detection of elevated lead levels covered under 18 the policy shall not be subject to annual deductibles or coinsurance. 19 For the purposes of this subsection, "elevated lead levels" shall have 20 the same meaning as set forth in subdivision six of section thirteen 21 hundred seventy of the public health law. 22 § 4. Subdivision 2 of section 365-a of the social services law is 23 amended by adding a new paragraph (nn) to read as follows: 24 (nn) screening and blood tests of children for elevated lead levels. 25 For the purposes of this paragraph, elevated lead levels shall have the 26 same definition as set forth in subdivision six of section thirteen 27 hundred seventy of the public health law. 28 § 5. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05676-01-5